Colorado, session 2026A, HB1175.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-61.5-105, amend
(1)(a.5); and add (5) and (6) as follows:
22-61.5-105. Colorado teacher of the year fund - created -
legislative declaration - repeal.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(1) (a.5) In addition to any moneys MONEY credited to the fund
pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS
SECTION, beginning in the 2014-15 budget year and in each budget year
thereafter THROUGH THE 2025-26 BUDGET YEAR, the state treasurer shall
annually transfer from the state education fund created in section 17 (4) of
article IX of the state constitution to the fund twenty-four thousand eight
hundred dollars.
(5) (a) ON JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
ALL UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE FUND THAT DOES NOT
ORIGINATE FROM GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS CREDITED TO THE FUND
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION TO THE STATE EDUCATION
FUND.
(b) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER ALL UNEXPENDED AND
UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE FUND ON AUGUST 31, 2027, TO THE STATE
EDUCATION FUND.
(6) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-61.5-104, add (4)
as follows:
22-61.5-104. Colorado teacher of the year program - created -
administration - funding - legislative declaration - rules.
(4) (a) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY ANNUALLY APPROPRIATE
MONEY FROM THE STATE EDUCATION FUND CREATED IN SECTION 17 (4) OF
ARTICLE IX OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION FOR THE PROGRAM.
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT, FOR PURPOSES OF
SECTION 17 OF ARTICLE IX OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION, THE COLORADO
TEACHER OF THE YEAR PROGRAM IS AN IMPORTANT ELEMENT IN PROVIDING
PERFORMANCE INCENTIVES FOR TEACHERS AND MAY THEREFORE RECEIVE
FUNDING FROM THE STATE EDUCATION FUND CREATED IN SECTION 17 (4) OF
ARTICLE IX OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-7-1210, amend (1)
introductory portion and (1)(d)(I); and add (8) and (9) as follows:
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1175

22-7-1210. Early literacy fund - created - legislative declaration
- repeal.
(1) The early literacy fund is hereby created in the state treasury and
is referred to in this section as the "fund". The fund shall consist CONSISTS
of:
(d) (I) For the 2013-14 budget year, an amount equal to sixteen
million dollars from the state education fund, and for the 2014-15 budget
year, and each budget year thereafter THROUGH THE 2025-26 BUDGET YEAR,
an amount equal to thirty-four million dollars from the state education fund.
On July 1, 2013, and on July 1 each year thereafter THROUGH JULY 1, 2025,
the state treasurer shall transfer the appropriate amount from the state
education fund to the early literacy fund.
(8) (a) ON JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
ALL UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE FUND TO THE STATE
EDUCATION FUND; EXCEPT THAT THE STATE TREASURER SHALL NOT
TRANSFER THE MONEY IN THE FUND THAT REMAINS AVAILABLE FOR
EXPENDITURE THROUGH THE 2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR FOR THE
DEPARTMENT'S "COLORADO READ ACT" TARGETED TRAINING INITIATIVE
THAT PROVIDES LITERACY EDUCATION TRAINING FOR TEACHERS, READING
INTERVENTIONISTS, PRINCIPALS, AND ADMINISTRATORS.
(b) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER ALL UNEXPENDED AND
UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE FUND ON AUGUST 31, 2027, TO THE STATE
EDUCATION FUND.
(9) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 22-7-1215 as
follows:
22-7-1215. Funding for part - state education fund - legislative
declaration.
(1) BEGINNING FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-27, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
SHALL ANNUALLY APPROPRIATE AT LEAST THIRTY-FOUR MILLION DOLLARS
FROM THE STATE EDUCATION FUND CREATED IN SECTION 17 (4) OF ARTICLE
IX OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION FOR THE FOLLOWING PURPOSES:
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1175

(a) TO IMPLEMENT THE PUBLIC INFORMATION CAMPAIGN TO
PROMOTE READING DESCRIBED IN SECTION 22-7-1209 (7);
(b) TO CONTRACT WITH AND PAY THE DIRECT COSTS INCURRED IN
OVERSEEING AN INDEPENDENT EVALUATOR AS PROVIDED IN SECTION
22-7-1209 (8);
(c) TO IMPLEMENT THE EARLY LITERACY GRANT PROGRAM CREATED
IN SECTION 22-7-1211;
(d) TO ALLOCATE PER-PUPIL INTERVENTION MONEY TO LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDERS AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 22-7-1210.5; AND
(e) TO PAY THE COSTS INCURRED IN PROVIDING TO LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDERS TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE IN IMPLEMENTING THIS PART
12, TRAINING TO TEACH READING FOR TEACHERS EMPLOYED TO TEACH
KINDERGARTEN THROUGH THIRD GRADE AND FOR READING
INTERVENTIONISTS EMPLOYED TO TEACH FOURTH GRADE THROUGH TWELFTH
GRADE, TRAINING FOR PRINCIPALS AND ADMINISTRATORS REQUIRED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-7-1208 (6.5), AND TRAINING FOR LIBRARIANS
PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-90-121; MONITORING THE USE OF MONEY
RECEIVED AS PER-PUPIL INTERVENTION MONEY OR GRANTS THROUGH THE
EARLY LITERACY GRANT PROGRAM; AND FULFILLING THE ADMINISTRATIVE
REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIED IN THIS PART 12.
(2) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT, FOR THE PURPOSES OF
SECTION 17 OF ARTICLE IX OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION, THE PURPOSES
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION ARE IN FURTHERANCE OF
PROVIDING STUDENTS ENROLLED IN KINDERGARTEN, FIRST, SECOND, OR
THIRD GRADE WITH THE INSTRUCTIONAL PROGRAMMING, INTERVENTION
INSTRUCTION, AND SUPPORT NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT STUDENTS, BY THE
COMPLETION OF THIRD GRADE, CAN DEMONSTRATE A LEVEL OF COMPETENCY
IN READING SKILLS THAT IS NECESSARY TO SUPPORT THEM IN ACHIEVING THE
ACADEMIC STANDARDS AND EXPECTATIONS APPLICABLE TO THE
FOURTH-GRADE CURRICULUM, WHICH IS A PROGRAM FOR ACCOUNTABLE
EDUCATION REFORM, AND MAY THEREFORE RECEIVE FUNDING FROM THE
STATE EDUCATION FUND CREATED IN SECTION 17 (4) OF ARTICLE IX OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-7-1211, amend (3)
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1175

introductory portion as follows:
22-7-1211. Early literacy grant program - created - definitions.
(3) Based on the recommendations of the department, the state board
shall award grants to applying local education providers or groups of local
education providers, which grants are paid from money in the early literacy
fund created in section 22-7-1210 OR FROM MONEY APPROPRIATED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-7-1215 FOR THE EARLY LITERACY GRANT
PROGRAM. Of the money allocated OR APPROPRIATED for the early literacy
grant program, pursuant to section 22-7-1210 (4), the state board shall
annually:
SECTION 6. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1175

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1175